District of Columbia statutes.
22-4243

Federal contribution to Criminal Justice Coordinating Council.

There are authorized to be appropriated for fiscal year 2002 and each succeeding fiscal year such sums as may be necessary for a federal contribution to the District of Columbia to cover the costs incurred by the District of Columbia Criminal Justice Coordinating Council.

May 20, 2002, 116 Stat. 581, Pub. L. 107-180, § 4

History